Wyoming, session 2025, HB0320.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is created the Taxation and Revenue Task
Force 2028 to consist of the following members:

(i) Members of the legislature, as follows:
HB0320

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0788

(A) Two (2) members of the Wyoming senate,
appointed by the president of the senate. Not more than one
(1) member shall be of the same political party;

(B) Two (2) members of the Wyoming house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house. Not
more than one (1) member shall be of the same political
party.

(ii) Members appointed by the governor, as
follows:

(A) Two (2) members representing Wyoming
county governments;

(B) Two (2) members representing Wyoming
cities and towns;

(C) One (1) member representing Wyoming
special districts;

HB0320

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0788
(D) One (1) member representing Wyoming
school districts;

(E) One (1) member representing revenue and
taxation expertise;

(F) One (1) member representing
constitutional expertise;

(G) Two (2) members of the general public.

(b) The governor shall appoint co-chairs for the task
force.

(c) The task force shall:

(i) Conduct a comprehensive analysis of the
sources of revenues currently available to local
governments, school districts and special districts as
designated in the Wyoming Constitution and Wyoming
statutes;

HB0320

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0788
(ii) Determine whether the revenues analyzed in
paragraph (i) of this subsection can provide for the
services provided by local governments, school districts
and special districts, and meet the constitutional mandate
for an equal and adequate education of all Wyoming children
while ensuring equal and uniform taxation within all
classes and subclasses of property;

(iii) Develop recommendations for providing
sustainable revenues for local governments, special
districts and schools through 2050 that take into account
all forecasted costs, potential revenues and declines in
revenues at the state and local levels through 2050;

(iv) Report its findings and recommendations,
including any recommended legislation, to the governor, the
Management Council and the Joint Revenue Interim Committee
not later than December 31, 2026.

(d) The task force shall be staffed by the Wyoming
department of revenue with assistance from the legislative
service office.

HB0320

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0788
(e) Subject to available funding, the task force may
recommend to the governor retention of consultants as
necessary to fulfill its duties under this section. State
agencies shall provide information to the task force as
requested by the task force.

(f) The legislative members of the task force shall
receive salary, per diem and travel expenses in the manner
and amount prescribed by W.S. 28-5-101. Task force members
representing Wyoming state government or its subdivisions
shall be considered to be acting within the scope of
regular employment when conducting the official business of
the task force and shall receive their regular pay without
additional compensation, except that those members
shall receive mileage and per diem as provided for other
members of the task force under this subsection if the
members are not reimbursed by their employer. All other
members of the task force shall not receive salary but
shall receive per diem and mileage in the amount provided
for members of the legislature under W.S. 28-5-101 when
conducting the official business of the task force.

Section 2.
HB0320

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0788

(a) There is appropriated thirty-six thousand dollars
($36,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative
service office for purposes of providing salary, mileage
and per diem to the legislative members of the task force
appointed under paragraph (a)(i) of section 1 of this act.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with
the effective date of this act and ending December 31,
2027. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028.

(b) There is appropriated ninety thousand dollars
($90,000.00) from the general fund to the office of the
governor for purposes of providing salary, mileage and per
diem to members of the task force appointed under paragraph
(a)(ii) of section 1 of this act, subject to subsection (f)
of section 1 of this act, and for other expenses of the
task force. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
December 31, 2027. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
HB0320

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0788
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0320